Louisiana, session 2026, HB15.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1473 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1473. Correction of administrative error
A. When an administrative error results in the overpayment or underpayment
of benefits, the board of trustees shall adjust the amount payable to the correct
amount and take all other actions necessary to correct the error.
B.(1) If an underpayment of benefits is due to an administrative error
committed by any person paid by the system to make the calculation, the correction
of such error pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall include the payment of
interest at the system's valuation interest rate.
(2) If an overpayment of benefits occurs, the board shall recover the
overpayment within a reasonable number of months as determined by the board of
trustees. The board may reduce the corrected amount of the benefit to recover the
overpayment. The board shall notify the benefit recipient of the overpayment, the
amount owed, and the amount and duration of the reduction in the benefits at least
thirty days before the payment of the benefit subject to the reduction.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 15 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.